Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2037
Limitation of actions.

Every claim and demand under sections 81-2014 to 81-2036 and against the retirement system or the board shall be forever barred unless the action is brought within two years of the time at which the claim accrued.

Laws 1996, LB 1076, § 36.